Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Financial Information

434.870.
Definitions for KRS 434.870 to 434.876.

As used in KRS

434.870

to

434.876

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Financial information” includes but is not limited to any of the following information identifiable to the individual that concerns the amount and conditions of an individual’s assets, liabilities, or credit:

Account numbers and balances;

Transactional information concerning any account;

Codes, passwords, Social Security numbers, tax identification numbers, and driver’s license numbers; and

Information held for the purpose of credit or loan acquisition, account access, or transaction initiation;

“Financial information repository” means any person engaged in the business of providing services to customers who have a credit, deposit, trust, stock, or other financial account or relationship with the person; and

“Person” means an individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or any entity however organized and whether or not organized to operate for profit.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 175, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 42, § 7, effective July 12, 2006.

434.872.
Disclosure of information from financial information repository — Penalties.

No person may obtain or attempt to obtain, or cause to be disclosed or attempt to cause to be disclosed to any person, financial information from a financial information repository by knowingly:

Making a false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or representation to an officer, employee, or agent of a financial information repository with the intent to deceive the officer, employee, or agent into relying on that statement or representation for the purpose of releasing financial information;

Making a false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or representation to a customer of a financial information repository with the intent to deceive the customer into releasing financial information or authorizing the release of such information; or

Providing any document to an officer, employee, or agent of a financial information repository, knowing that the document is forged, counterfeit, lost, or stolen, or that the document was fraudulently obtained, or that the document contains a false, fictitious, or fraudulent statement or representation, if such a document is provided with the intent to deceive the officer, employee, or agent into releasing the financial information.

Violation of this section is a Class D felony. If the person violating this section is a business that has violated this section on more than one (1) occasion, then that person also violates the Consumer Protection Act, KRS

367.110

to

367.300

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 175, § 5, effective July 15, 2002.

434.874.
Trafficking in financial information — Penalties.

A person is guilty of trafficking in financial information when he or she manufactures, sells, transfers, or purchases, or possesses with the intent to manufacture, sell, transfer, or purchase financial information for the purpose of committing any crime.

Trafficking in financial information is a Class C felony. If the person violating this section is a business that has violated this section on more than one (1) occasion, then that person also violates the Consumer Protection Act, KRS

367.110

to

367.300

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 175, § 6, effective July 15, 2002.

434.876.
Application of KRS 434.870 to 434.876.

No provision of KRS

434.870

to

434.876

shall be construed to prevent any action by a law enforcement agency, or any officer, employee, or agent of such agency, or any action of an agent of the financial information repository when working in conjunction with a law enforcement agency.

KRS

434.870

to

434.876

does not apply to:

Efforts by the financial information repository to test security procedures or systems of the financial institution repository for maintaining the confidentiality of customer information;

Investigations of alleged financial institution repository employee misconduct or negligence; or

Efforts to recover financial or personal information of the financial institution obtained or received by another person in any manner described in KRS

434.872

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 175, § 7, effective July 15, 2002.